Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6026.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 21-28-4.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-28 entitled "Uniform
Controlled Substances Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
21-28-4.01. Prohibited acts A — Penalties.
(a)(1) Except as authorized by this chapter and chapters 28.6 and 28.11 of title 21, it shall
be unlawful for any person to manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture or deliver
a controlled substance.
(2) Any person who is not a drug-addicted person, as defined in § 21-28-1.02, who violates
this subsection with respect to a controlled substance classified in schedule I or II, except the
substance classified as marijuana, is guilty of a crime and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned to
a term up to life or fined not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) nor less than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.
(3) Where the deliverance as prohibited in this subsection shall be the proximate cause of
death to the person to whom the controlled substance is delivered, it shall not be a defense that the
person delivering the substance was, at the time of delivery, a drug-addicted person as defined in §
21-28-1.02.
(4) Any person, except as provided for in subsection (a)(2), who violates this subsection
with respect to:
(i) A controlled substance, classified in schedule I or II, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) years, or fined not more than one

hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) nor less than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both;
(ii) A controlled substance, classified in schedule III or IV, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) years, or fined not more than forty
thousand dollars ($40,000), or both; provided, with respect to a controlled substance classified in
schedule III(d), upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not
more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or both.
(iii) A controlled substance, classified in schedule V, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than one year, or fined not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000), or both.
(b)(1) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to create, deliver,
or possess with intent to deliver, a counterfeit substance.
(2) Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:
(i) A counterfeit substance, classified in schedule I or II, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) years, or fined not more than one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or both;
(ii) A counterfeit substance, classified in schedule III or IV, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) years, or fined not more than forty
thousand dollars ($40,000), or both; provided, with respect to a controlled substance classified in
schedule III(d), upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not
more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or both.
(iii) A counterfeit substance, classified in schedule V, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than one year, or fined not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000), or both.
(c)(1) It shall be unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess a controlled
substance, unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or
order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice, or except as
otherwise authorized by this chapter or chapters 28.6 and 28.11 of title 21.
(2) Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:
(i) Except as otherwise provided in §§ 21-28-4.01.1 and 21-28-4.01.2, ten grams (10 g.)
twenty-eight grams (28 g.) or less of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of a
controlled substance classified in schedules I, II, III, IV, and V, except buprenorphine and the
substance classified as marijuana, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be
imprisoned for not more than two (2) years, or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or
both.
LC001068 - Page 2 of 7

(ii) Except as otherwise provided in §§ 21-28-4.01.1 and 21-28-4.01.2, more than ten grams
(10 g.) twenty-eight grams (28 g.), but less than one ounce (1 oz.) of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of a controlled substance classified in schedules I, II and III, IV,
and V, except buprenorphine and the substance classified as marijuana, is guilty of a felony and,
upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than three (3) years, or fined not more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(iii) Except as otherwise provided in §§ 21-28-4.01.1 and 21-28-4.01.2, more than two
ounces (2 oz.) or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate of a controlled
substance classified in schedule I as marijuana is guilty of a misdemeanor unless possessed inside
one’s own primary residence, except for those persons subject to (a)(1), and, upon conviction, may
be imprisoned for not more than one year, or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or
both. Exclusive of live marijuana plants, more than ten ounces (10 oz.) of a controlled substance
classified in schedule I as marijuana or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate,
when possessed within one’s personal residence is guilty of a misdemeanor, except for those
persons subject to (a)(1), and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than one year, or
fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.
Possession of live marijuana plants in excess of the number authorized pursuant to § 21-
28.11-22 but less than twenty-five (25) marijuana plants is guilty of a misdemeanor, except for
those persons subject to (a)(1) and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than one year,
or fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or
both.
Possession of twenty-five (25) or more live marijuana plants is guilty of a felony, except
for those persons subject to (a)(1), and upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than three
(3) years or fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(iv) Notwithstanding any public, special, or general law to the contrary, and except as
otherwise provided in §§ 21-28-4.01.1 and 21-28-4.01.2, the possession of more than one ounce (1
oz.) but not more than two ounces (2 oz.) of marijuana or the equivalent amount in the form of
cannabis concentrate by a person who is at least twenty-one (21) years old, and who is not exempted
from penalties pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title, shall constitute a civil offense, rendering the
offender liable to a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and forfeiture of
the marijuana, but not to any other form of criminal or civil punishment or disqualification.
Notwithstanding any public, special, or general law to the contrary, this civil penalty of one hundred
fifty dollars ($150) and forfeiture of the marijuana shall apply if the offense is the first (1st) or
second (2nd) violation within the previous eighteen (18) months.
LC001068 - Page 3 of 7

(v) Notwithstanding any public, special, or general law to the contrary, possession of two
ounces (2 oz.) or less of marijuana or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate by
a person between seventeen (17) and twenty (20) years old, and who is not exempted from penalties
pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title, shall constitute a civil offense, rendering the offender liable to
a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and forfeiture of the marijuana;
provided the minor offender completes an approved, drug-awareness program and community
service as determined by the court. If the person seventeen (17) years of age or older and under the
age of eighteen (18) years fails to complete an approved, drug-awareness program and community
service within one year of the disposition, the penalty shall be a three hundred dollar ($300) civil
fine and forfeiture of the marijuana, except that if no drug-awareness program or community
service is available, the penalty shall be a fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and forfeiture of
the marijuana. The parents or legal guardian of any offender seventeen (17) years of age or older
and under the age of eighteen (18) shall be notified of the offense and the availability of a drug-
awareness and community-service program. The drug-awareness program must be approved by the
court, but shall, at a minimum, provide four (4) hours of instruction or group discussion and ten
(10) hours of community service. Notwithstanding any other public, special, or general law to the
contrary, this civil penalty shall apply if the offense is the first or second violation within the
previous eighteen (18) months.
(vi) [Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 10 and P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 10.]
(vii) Any unpaid civil fine issued under (c)(2)(iv) or (c)(2)(v) shall double to three hundred
dollars ($300) if not paid within thirty (30) days of the disposition. The civil fine shall double again
to six hundred dollars ($600) if it has not been paid within ninety (90) days.
(viii) No person may be arrested for a violation of (c)(2)(iv) or (c)(2)(v) of this subsection
except as provided in this subparagraph. Any person in possession of an identification card, license,
or other form of identification issued by the state or any state, city, or town, or any college or
university, who fails to produce the same upon request of a police officer who informs the person
that he or she has been found in possession of what appears to the officer to be more than one ounce
(1 oz.) of marijuana, or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate or any person
without any such forms of identification who fails or refuses to truthfully provide his or her name,
address, and date of birth to a police officer who has informed such person that the officer intends
to provide such individual with a citation for possession of more than one ounce (1 oz.) but less
than two ounces (2 oz.) of marijuana or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate,
may be arrested.
(ix) No violation of (c)(2)(iv) or (c)(2)(v) of this subsection shall be considered a violation
LC001068 - Page 4 of 7

of parole or probation.
(x) Any records collected by any state agency, tribunal, or the family court that include
personally identifiable information about violations of (c)(2)(iv) or (c)(2)(v) shall not be open to
public inspection in accordance with § 8-8.2-21.
(d) The chief justice of the district court and the presiding justice of the superior court shall
provide an annual report to the general assembly that provides information concerning the racial
demographics of all parties convicted pursuant to this section or §§ 21-28-4.01.1 or 21-28-4.01.2.
(3) Jurisdiction.
(i) Any and all adjudications of violations of (c)(2)(i) shall be within the original
jurisdiction of the Rhode Island superior court. The department of attorney general shall prosecute
any and all violations of (c)(2)(i).
(ii) Any and all violations of (c)(2)(iv) and (c)(2)(v) shall be the exclusive jurisdiction of
the Rhode Island traffic tribunal. All money associated with the civil fine issued under (c)(2)(iv) or
(c)(2)(v) shall be payable to the Rhode Island traffic tribunal. Fifty percent (50%) of all fines
collected by the Rhode Island traffic tribunal from civil penalties issued pursuant to (c)(2)(iv) or
(c)(2)(v) shall be expended on drug-awareness and treatment programs for youth.
(4) Additionally, every person convicted or who pleads nolo contendere under (c)(2)(i) or
(c)(2)(ii) or convicted or who pleads nolo contendere a second or subsequent time under (c)(2)(iii),
who is not sentenced to a term of imprisonment to serve for the offense, shall be required to:
(i) Perform up to one hundred (100) hours of community service;
(ii) Attend and complete a drug-counseling and education program, as prescribed, by the
director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals
(BHDDH) similar to that in § 21-28.11-27.2, and pay the sum of four hundred dollars ($400) to
help defray the costs of this program which shall be deposited as general revenues. Failure to attend
may result, after hearing by the court, in jail sentence up to one year;
(iii) The court shall not suspend any part or all of the imposition of the fee required by this
subsection, unless the court finds an inability to pay;
(iv) If the offense involves the use of any automobile to transport the substance or the
substance is found within an automobile, then a person convicted or who pleads nolo contendere
under (c)(2)(i), (c)(2)(ii) or (c)(2)(iii) shall be subject to a loss of license for a period of six (6)
months for a first offense and one year for each offense after.
(5) All fees assessed and collected pursuant to (c)(2)(iii) shall be deposited as general
revenues and shall be collected from the person convicted or who pleads nolo contendere before
any other fines authorized by this chapter.
LC001068 - Page 5 of 7

(d) It shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
manufacture or distribute, an imitation controlled substance. Any person who violates this
subsection is guilty of a crime and, upon conviction, shall be subject to the same term of
imprisonment and/or fine as provided by this chapter for the manufacture or distribution of the
controlled substance that the particular imitation controlled substance forming the basis of the
prosecution was designed to resemble and/or represented to be; but in no case shall the
imprisonment be for more than five (5) years nor the fine for more than twenty thousand dollars
($20,000).
(e) It shall be unlawful for a practitioner to prescribe, order, distribute, supply, or sell an
anabolic steroid or human growth hormone for: (1) Enhancing performance in an exercise, sport,
or game, or (2) Hormonal manipulation intended to increase muscle mass, strength, or weight
without a medical necessity. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor
and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months or a fine of not more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.
(f) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly or intentionally possess, manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to manufacture or distribute, any extract, compound, salt
derivative, or mixture of salvia divinorum or datura stramonium or its extracts unless the person is
exempt pursuant to the provisions of § 21-28-3.30. Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, any
person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be
imprisoned for not more than one year, or fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or
both. The provisions of this section shall not apply to licensed physicians, pharmacists, and
accredited hospitals and teaching facilities engaged in the research or study of salvia divinorum or
datura stramonium and shall not apply to any person participating in clinical trials involving the
use of salvia divinorum or datura stramonium.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001068
========
LC001068 - Page 6 of 7